Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1907
Petition; contents.

A petition filed pursuant to section 76-1906 shall:

(1) Set forth a designation of the homestead which shall, with respect to the redemptive homestead, be limited by the boundaries of any designation made pursuant to section 76-1904 in any mortgage or trust deed having priority under section 76-1905; and

(2) Include a written appraisal report prepared and signed by a credentialed real property appraiser setting forth the appraiser's opinion of value and basis for such opinion of the current market value of each of the following: (a) The protected real estate as a whole; (b) the redemptive homestead if sold separately from the balance of the protected real estate; and (c) the balance of the protected real estate if sold separately from the redemptive homestead.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 7;

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 60;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 9.